Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1910
Field books; contents.

Each county surveyor shall procure, at the expense of the county, suitable memorandum field books for his or her use in the field. He or she shall enter in such field books, as the work progresses, all the details necessary to make up a complete record of each survey. The field books are to be properly indexed and kept on file as a part of the records of his or her office.

Laws 1913, c. 43, § 8, p. 144;

R.S.1913, § 5694;

C.S.1922, § 5024;

C.S.1929, § 26-1910;

R.S.1943, § 23-1910;

Laws 1982, LB 127, § 6.